Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Mississippi Juvenile Detention Facilities Licensing Act

§ 43-21-901.
Short title.

Sections 43-21-901 through 43-21-915 and Section 43-21-207 shall be cited as the “Mississippi Juvenile Detention Facilities Licensing Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 438, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 43-21-903.
Purpose.

The purpose of Sections 43-21-901 through 43-21-915 is to protect and promote the health and safety of the children who are detained in juvenile detention centers in this state by providing for the licensing of juvenile detention facilities to assure that certain minimum standards are maintained.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 438, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 43-21-905.
Definitions.

As used in Sections 43-21-901 through 43-21-915, the following words shall have the following meanings:

“Facility administrator” means the principal official of the facility.

“Facility staff” means all employees of the facility who are under the supervision of the facility administrator.

“Juvenile detention facility” and “facility” are synonymous and each means a secure facility that house children who are charged with a delinquent act as defined in Section 43-21-105(j).

“Licensing agency” means the Juvenile Facilities Monitoring Unit of the Department of Public Safety.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 438, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 43-21-907.
Licensing agencies; powers and duties.

The licensing agency shall have the following powers and duties, in addition to the other duties prescribed by law:

To adopt the licensing standards set forth by the Juvenile Detention and Alternatives Taskforce’s 2014 report;

To promulgate future rules and regulations concerning the licensing and regulation of juvenile detention facilities;

To issue, deny, suspend, revoke, restrict, or otherwise take disciplinary action against juvenile detention facilities;

To provide the training required by the rules and regulations promulgated by the licensing agency to all facility administrators and facility staff; and

To have such other powers as may be required to carry out the provisions of Sections 43-21-901 through 43-21-915.

The licensing agency shall require a criminal records background check and a child abuse registry check for all facility administrators and facility staff of a juvenile detention facility. The Department of Human Services has the authority to disclose to the licensing agency any potential applicant whose name is listed on the Child Abuse Central Registry or has a pending administrative review. That information shall remain confidential.

The licensing agency shall have the authority to exclude individuals or entities for prospective or current employment on the basis of a particular crime or crimes or a substantiated finding of child abuse or neglect.

Information in the possession of the licensing agency concerning the license of a juvenile detention facility may be disclosed to the public, but the information shall not be disclosed in a manner that would identify children detained in the facility. Nothing in this section affects the agency’s authority to release findings of investigations into allegations of abuse under either Section 43-21-353(8) or Section 43-21-257.

The Mississippi Department of Education is responsible for promulgating rules and regulations related to the education of all children housed in a juvenile detention facility. The Mississippi Department of Education must conduct inspections of the facility’s educational services at least annually or more often as deemed necessary. After each inspection, the department must provide the licensing agency with its determination of the facility’s compliance with the education provisions. The licensing agency shall use the information in its determination of the facility’s eligibility for licensure.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 438, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 43-21-909.
Identification of existence of issues that might prevent licensure; license required to own, operate and maintain juvenile detention facility.

Beginning October 1, 2016, the licensing agency shall conduct mock reviews of all juvenile detention facilities and determine what, if any, issues exist that may prevent licensure pursuant to the adopted rules and regulations. From and after October 1, 2017, no county or state entity shall establish, own, operate, and maintain a juvenile detention facility without a license issued under Sections 43-21-901 through 43-21-915.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 438, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 43-21-911.
Biennial renewal of license.

A license issued under Sections 43-21-901 through 43-21-915 must be renewed every two (2) years.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 438, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 43-21-913.
Compliance inspections by licensing agency.

The licensing agency shall make inspections to determine ongoing compliance with the laws and regulations governing the licensure of juvenile detention facilities. Inspections shall be made at least twice a year, but additional inspections may be made as often as deemed necessary by the licensing agency. The licensing agency is not required to provide any notice to the facility before making an inspection.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 438, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 43-21-915.
Denial, refusal to renew, suspension, revocation or restriction of license.

The licensing agency may deny or refuse to renew a license for any of the reasons set forth in subsection (3) of this section.

Before the licensing agency may deny or refuse to renew a license, the county or contractor operating the juvenile detention facility is entitled to a hearing before the director of the licensing agency in order to show cause why the license should not be denied or should be renewed.

The licensing agency may suspend, revoke, or restrict the license of any juvenile detention center upon one or more of the following grounds:

Fraud, misrepresentation or concealment of material facts;

Violation of any of the provisions of Sections 43-21-901 through 43-21-915 or any of the regulations governing the licensing and regulation of juvenile detention facilities promulgated by the licensing agency;

Any conduct, or failure to act that is found or determined by the licensing agency to threaten the health and safety of children at the facility;

Failure of a juvenile detention facility to conduct background checks as required under Section 43-21-907.

Information that is received by the licensing agency as a result of the criminal records background check and the child abuse registry check on all facility administrators and facility staff under Section 43-21-907.

The licensing agency shall develop rules and regulations related to the development and implementation of corrective action plans to address violations at facilities before a revocation, suspension, or restriction of the facility’s license.

Before the licensing agency may suspend, revoke or restrict the license of a facility, the county or contractor affected by that decision is entitled to a hearing before the director of the licensing agency in which it may show cause why the license should not be suspended, revoked, or restricted.

A juvenile detention facility that disagrees with or is aggrieved by the licensing agency in regard to the denial, refusal to renew, or the suspension, revocation, or restriction of the license for the juvenile detention facility may appeal to the chancery court of the county in which the facility is located. The appeal shall be filed no later than thirty (30) days after the licensee receives written notice of the final administrative action by the licensing agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 438, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2016.